test/src/morphology/N-niska_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - niska - ok : # -m animate noun
     niska+N+AN+Sg: niska
     niska+N+AN+Pl: niskak
     niska+N+AN+Loc: niskihk
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Sg: [niskisis, niskasis]
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Pl: [niskisisak, niskasisak]

     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niniska
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiniska
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg: oniska
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg: oniskiyiw # correct?
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niniskanân
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiniskanân
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskâw
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl: oniskâw
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl: oniskayiw

     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niniskak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiniskak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg: oniska
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg: oniskiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niniskinânak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiniskanawak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiniskiwâwak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl: oniskawâwa
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl: oniskayiwa

     niska+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: niniskisis
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: kiniskisis
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Sg: oniskisis
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iSg: oniskisisiyiw
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: niniskisisnân
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px12Pl: kiniskisisnân
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskisisâw
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Pl: oniskisisâw
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iPl: oniskisisyiw
 
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Sg: niniskasisak
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Sg: kiniskasisak
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Sg: oniskasisa
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iSg: oniskasisiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Pl: niniskasisinânak
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px12Pl: kiniskasisnawak
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Pl: kiniskasisiwâwak
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Pl: oniskasiswâwa
     niska+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iPl: oniskasisyiwa
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
